Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 67 Rhode Island Literacy and Dropout Prevention Act
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-67-1.
Declaration of policy.

The state of Rhode Island is committed to equal education opportunity for all citizens. To ensure the fulfillment of this commitment, all persons must have the opportunity to acquire the skills of literacy: basic reading, writing, speaking, listening, and mathematics skills. The opportunity to acquire these skills must be provided in programs designed to meet the varying needs of students. Special attention must be given to prevent students from dropping out of school. Research indicates that large classes prevent teachers from meeting the learning requirements of pupils on an individualized basis, where smaller classes enable teachers to use more varied, innovative, and effective learning approaches. We can increase effectiveness of our schools by promoting smaller classes in kindergarten through third grade. A foundation in these skill areas provides students with the skills they need to complete their elementary and secondary studies, to graduate from high school, and to participate in, and to contribute to, our society as literate and productive adults.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1.

16-67-2.
The literacy program.

Activities under this section shall include strategies to improve the performance of students in mathematics, reading and writing, and to specifically address issues of dyslexia. Such activities must be founded on a scientific research base, as described in the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, title I, part B, § 1208 (20 U.S.C. § 6368). Reading instruction to improve the reading skills of all students in the early grades (specifically kindergarten (K) through to and including grade five (5)) shall be consistent with the council on elementary and secondary education’s reading policy. This legislation requires that the following six (6) activities, which comprise the literacy program, be conducted:

Screening for all children first entering school. All school districts that provide elementary education are required to screen all children prior to, or upon, their first entry to school to determine their level of educational readiness. All children are required to participate in this screening. Screening shall address the child’s educational development and shall be used to determine whether he or she is educationally disadvantaged in terms of readiness for instruction in the literacy skills of reading, writing, speaking, listening, or mathematics.

Literacy focus in instruction in kindergarten through grade three (3) for all students. All school districts that provide elementary education shall focus their kindergarten through grade three (3) instruction for all students on literacy: reading, writing, speaking, listening, and mathematics. All instruction shall be geared to helping students achieve the outcomes in literacy that have been specified by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. School districts are encouraged to consider reducing class size to no more than fifteen (15) students as one means to achieving these outcomes. School districts will be held accountable for student achievement of the literacy outcomes.

Supplementary literacy instruction for educationally disadvantaged students in grades kindergarten through twelve (12).

Supplementary literacy (reading, writing, speaking, listening, and mathematics) instruction may be required for educationally disadvantaged students. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall stipulate for each school district the specific cutoff points and the grades for required service each year. Services must be provided first to students who are most educationally disadvantaged. Services shall focus on instruction in reading, writing, speaking, listening, and mathematics. Program emphasis shall be as follows:

Intensive development in literacy. Kindergarten through grade three (3).

Early intervention in literacy. Grades four (4) through six (6).

Remediation in literacy. Grades seven (7) through eight (8).

Intensive remediation in literacy. Grades nine (9) through twelve (12).

School districts will be held accountable for student achievement of the literacy outcomes.

Dropout prevention programs. Programs shall address the academic, social, or personal needs of potential dropouts. Projects shall be selected at the discretion of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

State-level program support. Activities shall provide for necessary planning and administrative functions and for a broadly representative advisory council.

Dyslexia-targeted assistance. The literacy program shall also include assistance to students by providing strategies that formally address dyslexia, when appropriate. In addition, the department of elementary and secondary education shall offer to school districts, at no cost to the school district or to participants in the training, professional development services to enhance the skills of elementary teachers in the use of evidence-based strategies to improve the literacy skills of students with dyslexia.

As used in this section, the term “dyslexia” means a specific and significant impairment in the development of reading, including, but not limited to, phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension that is not solely accounted for by intellectual disability, sensory disability or impairment, or lack of appropriate instruction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 205, § 1.

16-67-3.
Coordination with programs for special populations.

It is required that programs serving special population students be coordinated with the requirements of this chapter. All these programs shall focus on literacy objectives to the extent appropriate for each special population. All coordinating efforts shall not absolve participating school districts from meeting all requirements of state and/or federal laws, regulations, and mandates. In particular, programs for supplementary literacy instruction for educationally disadvantaged students in kindergarten through grade twelve (12) shall meet the following criteria which shall be included in a plan submitted annually and reviewed and approved by the department of elementary and secondary education:

Services shall be based on an annual assessment of need;

Programs shall have performance objectives evaluated annually;

Programs must provide supplementary services;

Programs must be monitored by the department of elementary and secondary education; and

School districts must keep records on the above and afford access to the records by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1.

16-67-4.
Funding.

Funding of programs. The programs described in this chapter shall be funded as follows:

Screening for all children first entering school. This program shall be supported by an annual appropriation. All children first entering school will be screened. Allocations to school districts will be determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

Literacy focus in instruction in kindergarten through grade three (3) for all students and supplementary literacy instruction for educationally disadvantaged students in grades Kindergarten through twelve (12).

These (2) programs shall be supported by funds set aside from the state operations aid to be provided to school districts; these programs may be supported with funds from the Educational Improvement Block Grant. The amount to be set aside will be four percent (4%) in each fiscal year. Each district will be informed of the set aside amount by November 1 of each year. The full set aside amount will be available for use by the district. Use of this set aside amount will be based on a plan submitted by local school districts to the department of elementary and secondary education for approval. All funds must be used to supplement, not supplant, existing activities. Use of these funds must be coordinated with other funds, including Chapter I and Section 4 funds. Provided, that the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may waive the requirement for use of all or part of the set aside amount for these purposes when it is shown to his or her satisfaction that the ongoing level of literacy instruction meets the standards set with regard to student achievement of the specified outcomes in literacy. The commissioner must respond to this request for waiver within sixty (60) days of receipt of the request. If no action is taken by the commissioner within the sixty (60) days time period the request shall be deemed approved.

The commissioner shall consider and shall address in a written decision each of the following factors in reaching a decision on whether or not a waiver shall be granted: (A) the average standardized test scores for the school district and each school within the district; (B) the number and percent of students in the school district who fall below the cut-off score established by the commissioner; (C) whether or not the scores and number of students referenced to in (A) and (B) have improved over the preceding three (3) years; (D) the percent of students for each of the preceding three (3) years who failed to graduate from high school; (E) the extent to which the literacy program of the district includes provision for: (I) integrating the literacy skills of reading, writing, speaking, and listening, (II) incorporating the literacy skills across content areas, (III) supplementing the basal reader program with the use of literature, (IV) incorporating process writing into the language arts curriculum, (V) supplementing instruction in literacy skills for low achieving students; and (F) the pupil teacher ratio in grades kindergarten through three (3). The commissioner will reply in detail to the community within the sixty (60) day period giving reasons for approval or denial of waiver.

Dropout prevention programs. These programs shall be supported by an annual appropriation. Projects shall be selected and funds shall be allocated at the discretion of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

State level program support. These activities shall be supported by an annual appropriation. Funds shall be allocated at the discretion of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

Commissioner’s report. The commissioner shall report to the governor and general assembly regarding the implementation of the literacy and dropout prevention programs and the need to continue the set-aside provision contained in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 50, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 112, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 58.

16-67-5.
Definition of educationally disadvantaged students.

For the purposes of this chapter, an educationally disadvantaged student is one whose educational readiness or educational achievement is below average for his or her age or grade level in terms of specified expected outcomes in literacy: reading, writing, speaking, listening, or mathematics. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education may include achievement test results, readiness test results, and specified expected student outcomes in reading, writing, speaking, listening, and mathematics in determining service cutoff points.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 3.

16-67-6.
Regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

It shall be the duty of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education to establish and promulgate regulations for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1.

16-67-7.
State advisory council.

A state advisory council shall be established by the department of elementary and secondary education. The council shall be composed of fifteen (15) members, to be appointed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and be representative of the population to be served or have demonstrated an interest in programs for educationally disadvantaged students. In appointing members to the state advisory council, the commissioner shall ensure that membership be broadly representative of the school population and include representation by teachers, parents, administrators, and school board members. Members of the state advisory council shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner, shall serve without compensation, and shall be residents of the state. The advisory council shall advise the commissioner on all matters pertaining to the literacy and dropout prevention program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 582, § 1.